Utah statutes.
79-5-103.   Division to plan and develop recreational trails in cooperation with public and private entities -- Priorities.

(1)  The division shall plan and develop a recreational trail system throughout the state that:

(a)  provides for outdoor recreation needs; and

(b)  facilitates access to, travel within, and enjoyment and admiration of the outdoors.

(2)  To assure that an integrated trails network is achieved, the division shall coordinate the planning and development of trails with:

(a)  federal land management agencies;

(b)  local governments;

(c)  private landowners; and

(d)  state agencies.

(3)  The division shall give priority to establishing trails that:

(a)  cross public lands;

(b)  are in proximity or accessible to urban areas;

(c)  implement rail-to-trail conversions pursuant to the National Trails System Act, 16 U.S.C. Sec. 1241 et seq.;

(d)  provide linkage to existing trails; and

(e)  provide linkage or access to natural, scenic, historic, or recreational areas of statewide significance.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

